Washington statutes.
RCW 10.79.040

Search without warrant unlawful—Penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any police officer or other peace officer to enter and search any private dwelling house or place of residence without the authority of a search warrant issued upon a complaint as by law provided.

(2) Any police officer or other peace officer violating the provisions of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1062; 2003 c 53 s 95; 1921 c 71 s 1; RRS s 2240-1. FORMER PART OF SECTION: 1921 c 71 s 2; RRS s 2240-2, now codified as RCW 10.79.045.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.